District of Columbia statutes.
51-133

Employer liability.

Benefits paid pursuant to this part shall not be charged to the experience rating accounts of employers, except that this section shall not apply to employers who have elected to make payments in lieu of contributions under § 51-103(f) and (h).

History

Aug. 28, 1935, ch. 794, § 33
as added June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-171, § 2(b), 51 DCR 4701